ko: 탁구 로봇 액세서리 유형: 배플; 볼 바스켓; 볼 버킷; 볼 캐치 네트; 볼 수집 네트; 볼 피더 호퍼; 볼 수거기; 볼 재활용 네트; 휴대용 케이스; 클리닝 키트; 세정액; 컨트롤 박스; 연장 케이블; 전원 어댑터; 리바운드 보드; 리모컨; 교체 부품; 로봇 커버; 점수 디스플레이; 사이드 네트; 스탠드/삼각대; 훈련 프로그램 카드; 훈련 시스템; 바퀴; 기타
es: Tipo de accesorio para robot lanzapelotas de ping pong: Deflector; Cesta de pelotas; Cubo de pelotas; Red de captura de pelotas; Red de recolección de pelotas; Tolva alimentadora de pelotas; Recolector de pelotas; Red de reciclaje de pelotas; Estuche de transporte; Kit de limpieza; Solución de limpieza; Caja de control; Cable de extensión; Adaptador de corriente; Tabla de rebote; Control remoto; Piezas de repuesto; Cubierta del robot; Pantalla de puntuación; Red lateral; Base/trípode; Tarjeta de programa de entrenamiento; Sistema de entrenamiento; Ruedas; Otro
hu: Asztalitenisz-robot kiegészítő típusa: Terelőlap; Labdakosár; Labdavödör; Labdafogó háló; Labdagyűjtő háló; Labdaadagoló; Labdaszedő; Labdavisszavezető háló; Hordtáska; Tisztítókészlet; Tisztítófolyadék; Vezérlődoboz; Hosszabbítókábel; Hálózati adapter; Visszapattanó fal; Távirányító; Cserealkatrészek; Robotvédő huzat; Eredményjelző; Oldalháló; Állvány/tripod; Edzésprogram-kártya; Edzőrendszer; Kerekek; Egyéb
zh-TW: 桌球機器人配件類型: 擋球板; 裝球籃; 裝球桶; 擋球網; 集球網; 供球器漏斗; 撿球器; 回收球網; 手提收納盒; 清潔組; 清潔液; 控制盒; 延長線; 電源變壓器; 回彈板; 遙控器; 替換零件; 發球機防塵套; 記分板; 側網; 支架/腳架; 訓練計畫卡; 訓練系統; 滾輪; 其他
bg-BG: Тип аксесоар за робот за пинг-понг: Преграда; Кош за топчета; Кофа за топчета; Мрежа за улавяне на топчета; Мрежа за събиране на топчета; Бункер за подаване на топчета; Събирач на топчета; Мрежа за рециклиране на топчета; Чанта за носене; Комплект за почистване; Почистващ разтвор; Контролна кутия; Удължител; Захранващ адаптер; Дъска за отскок; Дистанционно управление; Резервни части; Покривало за робот; Дисплей за резултат; Странична мрежа; Стойка/Трипод; Карта с тренировъчна програма; Система за тренировка; Колела; Друго
ro-RO: Tip accesoriu robot Ping -pong: Panou opritor; Coș pentru mingi; Găleată pentru mingi; Plasă de prindere a mingilor; Plasă de colectare a mingilor; Rezervor de alimentare cu mingi; Dispozitiv de adunat mingi; Plasă de reciclare a mingilor; Geantă de transport; Kit de curățare; Soluție de curățare; Cutie de control; Cablu prelungitor; Adaptor de alimentare; Placă de ricoșeu; Telecomandă; Piese de schimb; Husă pentru robot; Afișaj scor; Plasă laterală; Stativ/trepied; Card cu program de antrenament; Sistem de antrenament; Roți; Altele
en: Ping pong robot accessory type: Baffle; Ball basket; Ball bucket; Ball catch net; Ball collection net; Ball feeder hopper; Ball picker; Ball recycling net; Carrying case; Cleaning kit; Cleaning solution; Control box; Extension cable; Power adapter; Rebound board; Remote control; Replacement parts; Robot cover; Score display; Side net; Stand/tripod; Training program card; Training system; Wheels; Other
it: Tipo di accessorio per robot da ping pong: Deflettore; Cesto raccoglipalline; Secchio per palline; Rete raccoglipalline; Rete di raccolta palline; Tramoggia caricapalline; Raccoglitore di palline; Rete di recupero palline; Custodia per il trasporto; Kit di pulizia; Soluzione detergente; Scatola di controllo; Cavo di prolunga; Alimentatore; Tavola di rimbalzo; Telecomando; Pezzi di ricambio; Copertura per robot; Display del punteggio; Rete laterale; Supporto/treppiede; Scheda del programma di allenamento; Sistema di allenamento; Ruote; Altro
pt-PT: tipo de acessório para robô Ping -pongue: Defletor; Cesto para bolas; Balde para bolas; Rede de captura de bolas; Rede de recolha de bolas; Tremonha de alimentação de bolas; Apanha-bolas; Rede de reciclagem de bolas; Estojo de transporte; Kit de limpeza; Solução de limpeza; Caixa de controlo; Cabo de extensão; Adaptador de corrente; Tabela de ressalto; Comando à distância; Peças de substituição; Capa para robô; Visor de pontuação; Rede lateral; Suporte/tripé; Cartão de programa de treino; Sistema de treino; Rodas; Outro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมหุ่นยนต์ปิงปอง: แผ่นกั้น; ตะกร้าเก็บลูก; ถังเก็บลูก; ตาข่ายดักลูก; ตาข่ายรวบรวมลูก; ช่องจ่ายลูก; ไม้เก็บลูกปิงปอง; ตาข่ายรีไซเคิลลูก; กระเป๋าพกพา; ชุดทำความสะอาด; น้ำยาทำความสะอาด; กล่องควบคุม; สายต่อพ่วง; อะแดปเตอร์แปลงไฟ; กระดานสะท้อนกลับ; รีโมทคอนโทรล; อะไหล่เปลี่ยน; ผ้าคลุมหุ่นยนต์; หน้าจอแสดงคะแนน; ตาข่ายด้านข้าง; ขาตั้ง/ขาตั้งสามขา; การ์ดโปรแกรมฝึกซ้อม; ระบบฝึกซ้อม; ล้อ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Pingue-pongue robô acessório tipo: Defletor; Cesta de bolas; Balde de bolas; Rede de captura de bolas; Rede de coleta de bolas; Funil alimentador de bolas; Coletor de bolas; Rede de reciclagem de bolas; Estojo de transporte; Kit de limpeza; Solução de limpeza; Caixa de controle; Cabo de extensão; Adaptador de energia; Placa de rebote; Controle remoto; Peças de reposição; Capa do robô; Placar; Rede lateral; Suporte/tripé; Cartão do programa de treinamento; Sistema de treinamento; Rodas; Outros
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatka za robot za namizni tenis: Zaslon; Košara za žogice; Vedro za žogice; Mreža za lovljenje žogic; Mreža za zbiranje žogic; Lijak za podajanje žogic; Pobiralec žogic; Mreža za recikliranje žogic; Kovček za prenašanje; Komplet za čiščenje; Tekočina za čiščenje; Krmilna omarica; Podaljšek; Napajalnik; Odbojna plošča; Daljinski upravljalnik; Nadomestni deli; Pokrov za robota; Prikazovalnik rezultatov; Stranska mreža; Stojalo/trinožnik; Kartica s programom za trening; Sistem za trening; Kolesa; Drugo
ja: 卓球ロボット用アクセサリータイプ: バッフル; ボールバスケット; ボールバケツ; ボールキャッチネット; ボール回収ネット; ボールフィーダーホッパー; ボールピッカー; ボール循環ネット; キャリングケース; クリーニングキット; クリーニング液; コントロールボックス; 延長ケーブル; 電源アダプター; リバウンドボード; リモコン; 交換部品; ロボットカバー; スコアディスプレイ; サイドネット; スタンド/三脚; トレーニングプログラムカード; トレーニングシステム; ホイール; その他
ru: Тип аксессуара робота для настольного тенниса: Отражатель; Корзина для мячей; Ведро для мячей; Сетка-улавливатель мячей; Сетка для сбора мячей; Бункер подачи мячей; Сборщик мячей; Сетка для возврата мячей; Чехол для переноски; Набор для очистки; Чистящий раствор; Блок управления; Удлинитель; Адаптер питания; Отражающая доска; Пульт дистанционного управления; Запасные части; Чехол для робота; Табло счета; Боковая сетка; Стойка / штатив; Карточка тренировочной программы; Тренировочная система; Колеса; Другое
nl: Tafeltennisrobot accessoiretype: Schot; Ballenmand; Ballenemmer; Ballenvangnet; Ballenverzamelnet; Ballenhopper; Ballenraper; Ballenrecyclingnet; Draagkoffer; Schoonmaakset; Schoonmaakmiddel; Bedieningskast; Verlengkabel; Voedingsadapter; Rebound-bord; Afstandsbediening; Reserveonderdelen; Robotbeschermhoes; Scorebord; Zijnet; Standaard/statief; Trainingsprogrammakaart; Trainingssysteem; Wielen; Overig
fi: Pöytätennisrobotin lisävarusteen tyyppi: Pysäytysverkko; Pallokori; Palloämpäri; Pallonkeräysverkko; Pallonkeräysverkko; Pallonsyöttösuppilo; Pallonkerääjä; Pallonpalautusverkko; Kantolaukku; Puhdistuspakkaus; Puhdistusaine; Ohjausyksikkö; Jatkojohto; Virtalähde; Palautuslevy; Kaukosäädin; Varaosat; Robotin suojus; Pistetaulu; Sivuverkko; Teline/kolmijalka; Harjoitusohjelmakortti; Harjoitusjärjestelmä; Pyörät; Muu
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος ρομπότ πινγκ-πονγκ: Διάφραγμα; Καλάθι μπαλών; Κουβάς μπαλών; Δίχτυ συγκράτησης μπαλών; Δίχτυ συλλογής μπαλών; Χοάνη τροφοδοσίας μπαλών; Εργαλείο συλλογής μπαλών; Δίχτυ ανακύκλωσης μπαλών; Θήκη μεταφοράς; Κιτ καθαρισμού; Διάλυμα καθαρισμού; Κουτί ελέγχου; Καλώδιο επέκτασης; Τροφοδοτικό ρεύματος; Πίνακας αναπήδησης; Τηλεχειριστήριο; Ανταλλακτικά; Κάλυμμα ρομπότ; Οθόνη βαθμολογίας; Πλαϊνό δίχτυ; Βάση/τρίποδο; Κάρτα προγράμματος προπόνησης; Σύστημα προπόνησης; Ρόδες; Άλλο
vi: Phụ kiện robot bóng bàn: Tấm chắn; Giỏ đựng bóng; Thùng đựng bóng; Lưới bắt bóng; Lưới thu bóng; Phễu nạp bóng; Dụng cụ nhặt bóng; Lưới thu hồi bóng; Hộp đựng; Bộ vệ sinh; Dung dịch vệ sinh; Hộp điều khiển; Cáp nối dài; Bộ đổi nguồn; Bảng phản xạ; Điều khiển từ xa; Phụ tùng thay thế; Vỏ bọc robot; Bảng hiển thị điểm số; Lưới phụ; Giá đỡ/chân máy; Thẻ chương trình tập luyện; Hệ thống tập luyện; Bánh xe; Khác
da: Bordtennisrobots tilbehørstype: Skærm; Boldkurv; Boldspand; Boldfangnet; Opsamlingsnet til bolde; Boldbeholder; Boldopsamler; Genbrugsnet til bolde; Bæretaske; Rengøringssæt; Rengøringsmiddel; Kontrolboks; Forlængerkabel; Strømadapter; Rebound-plade; Fjernbetjening; Reservedele; Cover til robot; Pointtavle; Sidenet; Stativ/tripod; Kort med træningsprogram; Træningssystem; Hjul; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta pribora za robota Ping -pong: Pregrada; Košara za loptice; Kanta za loptice; Mreža za hvatanje loptica; Mreža za skupljanje loptica; Spremnik za izbacivanje loptica; Sakupljač loptica; Mreža za vraćanje loptica; Torba za nošenje; Pribor za čišćenje; Otopina za čišćenje; Kontrolna kutija; Produžni kabel; Strujni adapter; Ploča za odbijanje; Daljinski upravljač; Zamjenski dijelovi; Navlaka za robota; Prikaz rezultata; Bočna mreža; Stalak/tronožac; Kartica s programom treninga; Sustav za trening; Kotači; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva pre robota na stolný tenis: Zábrana; Kôš na loptičky; Vedro na loptičky; Sieťka na zachytávanie loptičiek; Sieťka na zber loptičiek; Zásobník loptičiek; Zberač loptičiek; Recyklačná sieťka na loptičky; Prenosné puzdro; Čistiaca súprava; Čistiaci roztok; Ovládacia skrinka; Predlžovací kábel; Napájací adaptér; Odrazová doska; Diaľkový ovládač; Náhradné diely; Kryt na robota; Zobrazenie skóre; Bočná sieťka; Stojan/statív; Karta tréningového programu; Tréningový systém; Kolieska; Iné
zh-CN: 乒乓球发球机器人配件类型: 挡板; 球筐; 球桶; 挡球网; 集球网; 储球斗; 捡球器; 回收球网; 手提箱; 清洁套装; 清洁液; 控制盒; 延长线; 电源适配器; 反弹板; 遥控器; 替换零件; 机器防尘罩; 记分显示器; 侧网; 支架/三脚架; 训练计划卡; 训练系统; 轮子; 其他
tr: Masa tenisi robotu aksesuar türü: Ayırıcı; Top sepeti; Top kovası; Top yakalama filesi; Top toplama filesi; Top besleme haznesi; Top toplayıcı; Top geri dönüşüm filesi; Taşıma çantası; Temizleme kiti; Temizleme solüsyonu; Kontrol kutusu; Uzatma kablosu; Güç adaptörü; Ribaund panosu; Uzaktan kumanda; Yedek parçalar; Robot kılıfı; Skor ekranı; Yan file; Stand/tripod; Antrenman programı kartı; Antrenman sistemi; Tekerlekler; Diğer
de: Zubehörart für Tischtennisroboter: Prallwand; Ballkorb; Balleimer; Ballauffangnetz; Ballsammelnetz; Balltrichter; Ballsammler; Ballrückführungsnetz; Tragetasche; Reinigungsset; Reinigungsmittel; Steuerbox; Verlängerungskabel; Netzteil; Rebound-Board; Fernbedienung; Ersatzteile; Roboterabdeckung; Anzeigetafel; Seitennetz; Ständer/Stativ; Trainingsprogrammkarte; Trainingssystem; Rollen; Andere
nb: Tilbehørstype for pingpongrobot: Skjermbrett; Ballkurv; Ballbøtte; Ballfangernett; Balloppsamlingsnett; Ballmater; Ballplukker; Ballresirkuleringsnett; Bæreveske; Rengjøringssett; Rengjøringsmiddel; Kontrollboks; Skjøteledning; Strømadapter; Returbrett; Fjernkontroll; Reservedeler; Robottrekk; Resultattavle; Sidenett; Stativ / trefot; Treningsprogramkort; Treningssystem; Hjul; Annet
cs: Typ příslušenství pro robota Ping pong: Přepážka; Koš na míčky; Kbelík na míčky; Záchytná síť na míčky; Sběrná síť na míčky; Zásobník podavače míčků; Sběrač míčků; Síť pro recyklaci míčků; Přepravní pouzdro; Čisticí sada; Čisticí roztok; Ovládací skříňka; Prodlužovací kabel; Napájecí adaptér; Odrazová deska; Dálkové ovládání; Náhradní díly; Kryt robota; Zobrazení skóre; Boční síť; Stojan/stativ; Karta tréninkového programu; Tréninkový systém; Kolečka; Ostatní
fr: Type d’accessoire de robot de ping-pong: Déflecteur; Panier à balles; Seau à balles; Filet de récupération de balles; Filet de ramassage de balles; Entonnoir d’alimentation de balles; Ramasseur de balles; Filet de recyclage de balles; Étui de transport; Kit de nettoyage; Solution de nettoyage; Boîtier de commande; Câble de rallonge; Adaptateur d’alimentation; Planche de rebond; Télécommande; Pièces de rechange; Housse pour robot; Affichage du score; Filet latéral; Support/trépied; Carte de programme d’entraînement; Système d’entraînement; Roues; Autre
lt-LT: Stalo teniso roboto priedo tipas: Pertvara; Kamuoliukų krepšys; Kamuoliukų kibiras; Kamuoliukų gaudymo tinklas; Kamuoliukų surinkimo tinklas; Kamuoliukų tiektuvo bunkeris; Kamuoliukų rinkiklis; Kamuoliukų grąžinimo tinklas; Nešiojimo dėklas; Valymo rinkinys; Valymo skystis; Valdymo blokas; Ilginamasis laidas; Maitinimo adapteris; Atšokimo lenta; Nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Atsarginės dalys; Roboto gaubtas; Rezultato ekranas; Šoninis tinklas; Stovas / trikojis; Treniruočių programos kortelė; Treniruočių sistema; Ratukai; Kita
pl: Typ akcesorium do robota pingpongowego: Przegroda; Kosz na piłki; Wiadro na piłki; Siatka do łapania piłek; Siatka do zbierania piłek; Podajnik piłek; Zbierak do piłek; Siatka do odzyskiwania piłek; Walizka transportowa; Zestaw do czyszczenia; Płyn do czyszczenia; Panel sterowania; Przedłużacz; Zasilacz; Tablica odbijająca; Pilot zdalnego sterowania; Części zamienne; Pokrowiec na robota; Wyświetlacz wyników; Siatka boczna; Stojak / statyw; Karta programów treningowych; System treningowy; Kółka; Inne
sv: Typ av tillbehör till pingisrobot: Skärm; Bollkorg; Bollhink; Uppsamlingsnät; Insamlingsnät; Bollmagasin; Bollplockare; Återvinningsnät; Bärväska; Rengöringskit; Rengöringslösning; Kontrolldosa; Förlängningskabel; Strömadapter; Returbräda; Fjärrkontroll; Reservdelar; Robotöverdrag; Poängtavla; Sidonät; Stativ/trebent stativ; Kort med träningsprogram; Träningssystem; Hjul; Övrigt